Missouri, session 2026, SB1545.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 313.660, RSMo, is repealed, to read as
follows:
[313.660. 1. No individual shall for a
fee, directly or indirectly, accept anything of
value to be wagered or to be transmitted or
delivered for wager in any pari-mutuel system of
wagering on horse racing or for a fee deliver
anything of value which has been received
outside of the enclosure of a race track holding
a horse race licensed under sections 313.500 to
313.710 to be placed as wagers in the pari-
mutuel pool within such enclosure.
2. Any individual violating the provisions
of this section shall upon conviction be guilty
of a class D felony.]
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.